California statutes. Penal Code
If the court or judge is satisfied that the examination of the witness is necessary, an order must be made that the witness be examined conditionally, at a specified time and place, and before a magistrate designated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

1340.

(a) The defendant has the right to be present in person and with counsel at the examination, and if the defendant is in custody, the officer in whose custody he or she is, must be informed of the time and place of the examination, and must take the defendant thereto, and keep him or her in the presence and hearing of the witness during the examination.

(b) If the court determines that the witness to be examined is so sick or infirm as to be unable to participate in the examination in person, the court may allow the examination to be conducted by a contemporaneous, two-way video conference system, in which the parties and the witness can see and hear each other via electronic communication.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to require the court to acquire two-way video conference equipment for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1341.

If, at the designated time and place, it is shown to the satisfaction of the magistrate that the stated ground for conditional examination is not true or that the application was made to avoid the examination of the witness at the trial, the examination cannot take place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   (SB 197)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1342.

The attendance of the witness may be enforced by a subpoena, issued by the magistrate before whom the examination is to be taken.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1343.

The testimony given by the witness shall be reduced to writing and authenticated in the same manner as the testimony of a witness taken in support of an information. Additionally, the testimony may be video-recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1344.

The deposition taken must, by the magistrate, be sealed up and transmitted to the Clerk of the Court in which the action is pending or may come for trial.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1345.

The deposition, or a certified copy of it, may be read in evidence, or if the examination was video-recorded, that video-recording may be shown by either party at the trial if the court finds that the witness is unavailable as a witness within the meaning of Section 240 of the Evidence Code. The same objections may be taken to a question or answer contained in the deposition or video-recording as if the witness had been examined orally in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 19, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Examination of Victims of Sexual Crimes [1346. - 1347.5.]

1346.

(a) When a defendant has been charged with a violation of Section 220, 243.4, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 269, 273a, 273d, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 288.7, 289, or 647.6, or former Section 288a, and the victim either is a person 15 years of age or younger or is developmentally disabled as a result of an intellectual disability, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the people may apply for an order that the victim’s testimony at the preliminary hearing, in addition to being stenographically recorded, be video recorded and the video recording preserved.

(b) The application for the order shall be in writing and made three days prior to the preliminary hearing.

(c) Upon timely receipt of the application, the magistrate shall order that the testimony of the victim given at the preliminary hearing be taken and preserved as a video recording, in addition to being stenographically recorded. The video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending.

(d) If at the time of trial the court finds that further testimony would cause the victim emotional trauma so that the victim is medically unavailable or unavailable within the meaning of Section 240 of the Evidence Code, the court may admit the video recording of the victim’s testimony at the preliminary hearing as former testimony under
 Section 1291 of the Evidence Code.

(e) A video recording that is taken pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the victim. This subdivision does not affect the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 868.7.

(f) A video recording made pursuant to this section shall be made available to the prosecuting attorney, the defendant, and his or her attorney for viewing during ordinary business hours. A video recording that is made available pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the victim.

(g) The video recording shall be destroyed after five years have elapsed from the date of
 entry of judgment, except that if an appeal is filed, the video recording shall not be destroyed until a final judgment on appeal has been rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 97.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1346.1.

(a) When a defendant has been charged with a violation of Section 261, if the victim is the spouse of the defendant, former Section 262, or subdivision (a) of Section 273.5, the people may apply for an order that the victim’s testimony at the preliminary hearing, in addition to being stenographically recorded, be video recorded and the video recording preserved.

(b) The application for the order shall be in writing and made three days prior to the preliminary hearing.

(c) Upon timely receipt of the application, the magistrate shall order that the testimony of the victim given at the preliminary hearing be taken and preserved as a video recording, in addition to being stenographically recorded. The
 video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending.

(d) If the victim’s prior testimony given at the preliminary hearing is admissible pursuant to the Evidence Code, then the video recording of that testimony may be introduced as evidence at trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 25.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide the court with discretion to employ alternative court procedures to protect the rights of a child witness, the rights of the defendant, and the integrity of the judicial process. In exercising its discretion, the court necessarily will be required to balance the rights of the defendant or defendants against the need to protect a child witness and to preserve the integrity of the court’s truthfinding function. This discretion is intended to be used selectively when the facts and circumstances in an individual
 case present compelling evidence of the need to use these alternative procedures.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the court in a criminal proceeding, upon written notice by the prosecutor made at least three days prior to the date of the preliminary hearing or trial date on which the testimony of the minor is scheduled, or during the course of the proceeding on the court’s own motion, may order that the testimony of a minor 13 years of age or younger at the time of the motion be taken by contemporaneous examination and cross-examination in another place and out of the presence of the judge, jury, defendant or defendants, and attorneys, and communicated to the courtroom by means of closed-circuit television, if the court makes all of the following findings:

(1) The
 minor’s testimony will involve a recitation of the facts of any of the following:

(A) An alleged sexual offense committed on or with the minor.

(B) An alleged violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(C) An alleged felony offense specified in Section 273a or 273d of which the minor is a victim.

(2) The impact on the minor of one or more of the factors enumerated in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, is shown by clear and convincing evidence to be so substantial as to make the minor unavailable as a witness unless closed-circuit testimony is used.

(A) Testimony by the minor
 in the presence of the defendant would result in the child suffering serious emotional distress so that the child would be unavailable as a witness.

(B) The defendant used a deadly weapon in the commission of the offense.

(C) The defendant threatened serious bodily injury to the child or the child’s family, threatened incarceration or deportation of the child or a member of the child’s family, threatened removal of the child from the child’s family, or threatened the dissolution of the child’s family in order to prevent or dissuade the minor from attending or giving testimony at any trial or court proceeding, or to prevent the minor from reporting the alleged sexual offense, or from assisting in criminal prosecution.

(D) The defendant inflicted great bodily injury upon the child in the commission of the offense.

(E) The defendant or his or her counsel behaved during the hearing or trial in a way that caused the minor to be unable to continue his or her testimony.

In making the determination required by this section, the court shall consider the age of the minor, the relationship between the minor and the defendant or defendants, any handicap or disability of the minor, and the nature of the acts charged. The minor’s refusal to testify shall not alone constitute sufficient evidence that the special procedure described in this section is necessary to obtain the minor’s testimony.

(3) The equipment available for use of closed-circuit
 television would accurately communicate the image and demeanor of the minor to the judge, jury, defendant or defendants, and attorneys.

(c) If the court orders the use of closed-circuit television, two-way closed-circuit television shall be used, except that if the impact on the minor of one or more of the factors enumerated in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), is shown by clear and convincing evidence to be so substantial as to make the minor unavailable as a witness even if two-way closed-circuit television is used, one-way closed-circuit television may be used. The prosecution shall give the defendant or defendants at least 30 days’ written notice of the prosecution’s intent to seek the use of one-way closed-circuit television, unless
 the prosecution shows good cause to the court why this 30-day notice requirement should not apply.

(d) (1) The hearing on a motion brought pursuant to this section shall be conducted out of the presence of the jury.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 804 of the Evidence Code or any other law, the court, in determining the merits of the motion, shall not compel the minor to testify at the hearing, nor shall the court deny the motion on the ground that the minor has not testified.

(3) In determining whether the impact on an individual child of one or more of the five factors enumerated in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) is so substantial that the minor is unavailable as a witness unless two-way or one-way closed-circuit television is used, the court may question the minor in chambers, or at some other comfortable place other than the courtroom, on the record for a reasonable period of time with the support person, the prosecutor, and defense counsel present. The defendant or defendants shall not be present. The court shall conduct the questioning of the minor and shall not permit the prosecutor or defense counsel to examine the minor. The prosecutor and defense counsel shall be permitted to submit proposed questions to the court prior to the session in chambers. Defense counsel shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to consult with the defendant or defendants prior to the conclusion of the session in chambers.

(e) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside of the courtroom, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Make a brief statement on the record, outside of the presence of the jury, of the reasons in support of its order. While the statement need not include traditional findings of fact, the reasons shall be set forth with sufficient specificity to permit meaningful review and to demonstrate that discretion was exercised in a careful, reasonable, and equitable manner.

(2) Instruct the members of the jury that they are to draw no inferences from the use of closed-circuit television as a means of facilitating the testimony of the minor.

(3) Instruct respective
 counsel, outside of the presence of the jury, that they are to make no comment during the course of the trial on the use of closed-circuit television procedures.

(4) Instruct the support witness, outside of the presence of the jury, that he or she is not to coach, cue, or in any way influence or attempt to influence the testimony of the minor.

(5) Order that a complete record of the examination of the minor, including the images and voices of all persons who in any way participate in the examination, be made and preserved as a video recording in addition to being stenographically recorded. The video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending and shall be made available for viewing to the prosecuting attorney, the defendant or defendants, and his
 or her attorney during ordinary business hours. The video recording shall be destroyed after five years have elapsed from the date of entry of judgment. If an appeal is filed, the video recording shall not be destroyed until a final judgment on appeal has been ordered. A video recording that is taken pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the witness. This subdivision does not affect the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 868.7.

(f) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, only the minor, a support person designated pursuant to Section 868.5, a nonuniformed bailiff, any technicians necessary to operate the closed-circuit equipment, and, after consultation with the prosecution and the defense, a
 representative appointed by the court, shall be physically present for the testimony. A video recording device shall record the image of the minor and his or her testimony, and a separate video recording device shall record the image of the support person.

(g) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, the minor shall be brought into the judge’s chambers prior to the taking of his or her testimony to meet for a reasonable period of time with the judge, the prosecutor, and defense counsel. A support person for the minor shall also be present. This meeting shall be for the purpose of explaining the court process to the child and to allow the attorneys an opportunity to establish rapport with the child to facilitate later questioning by closed-circuit television. No participant shall discuss the
 defendant or defendants or any of the facts of the case with the minor during this meeting.

(h) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, nothing in this section prohibits the court from ordering the minor to be brought into the courtroom for a limited purpose, including the identification of the defendant or defendants as the court deems necessary.

(i) The examination shall be under oath, and the defendant or defendants shall be able to see and hear the minor witness, and if two-way closed-circuit television is used, the defendant’s image shall be transmitted live to the witness.

(j) Nothing in this section affects the disqualification of witnesses pursuant to Section 701
 of the Evidence Code.

(k) The cost of examination by contemporaneous closed-circuit television ordered pursuant to this section shall be borne by the court out of its existing budget.

(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a defendant from being represented by counsel during any closed-circuit testimony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   (SB 176)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.1.

(a) In any criminal proceeding in which a defendant is charged with a violation of Section 236.1, upon written notice by the prosecutor made at least three days prior to the date of the preliminary hearing or trial date on which the testimony of the minor is scheduled, or during the course of the proceeding on the court’s own motion, may order that the testimony of a minor 15 years of age or younger at the time of the motion be taken by contemporaneous examination and cross-examination in another place and out of the presence of the judge, jury, defendant or defendants, and attorneys, and communicated to the courtroom by means of closed-circuit television, if the court makes all of the following findings:

(1) The minor’s testimony will involve a recitation of the facts of an alleged offense of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1.

(2) (A) The impact on the minor of one or more of the factors enumerated in clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, is shown by clear and convincing evidence to be so substantial as to make the minor unavailable as a witness unless closed-circuit testimony is used.

(i) Testimony by the minor in the presence of the defendant would result in the minor suffering serious emotional distress so that the minor would be unavailable as a witness.

(ii) The defendant used a deadly weapon in the commission of the
 offense.

(iii) The defendant threatened serious bodily injury to the minor or the minor’s family, threatened incarceration or deportation of the minor or a member of the minor’s family, threatened removal of the minor from the minor’s family, or threatened the dissolution of the minor’s family in order to prevent or dissuade the minor from attending or giving testimony at any trial or court proceeding, or to prevent the minor from reporting the alleged offense, or from assisting in criminal prosecution.

(iv) The defendant inflicted great bodily injury upon the minor in the commission of the offense.

(v) The defendant or his or her counsel behaved during the hearing or trial in a way that caused the minor to be unable to continue
 his or her testimony.

(B) In making the determination required by this paragraph, the court shall consider the age of the minor, the relationship between the minor and the defendant or defendants, any handicap or disability of the minor, and the nature of the acts charged. The minor’s refusal to testify shall not alone constitute sufficient evidence that the special procedure described in this section is necessary to obtain the minor’s testimony.

(3) The equipment available for use of closed-circuit television would accurately communicate the image and demeanor of the minor to the judge, jury, defendant or defendants, and attorneys.

(b) If the court orders the use of closed-circuit television, two-way closed-circuit
 television shall be used, except that if the impact on the minor of one or more of the factors enumerated in clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), is shown by clear and convincing evidence to be so substantial as to make the minor unavailable as a witness even if two-way closed-circuit television is used, one-way closed-circuit television may be used. The prosecution shall give the defendant or defendants at least 30 days’ written notice of the prosecution’s intent to seek the use of one-way closed-circuit television, unless the prosecution shows good cause to the court why this 30-day notice requirement should not apply.

(c) (1) The hearing on a motion brought pursuant to this section shall be conducted out of the presence of the jury.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 804 of the Evidence Code or any other law, the court, in determining the merits of the motion, shall not compel the minor to testify at the hearing, nor shall the court deny the motion on the ground that the minor has not testified.

(3) In determining whether the impact on an individual minor of one or more of the five factors enumerated in clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is so substantial that the minor is unavailable as a witness unless two-way or one-way closed-circuit television is used, the court may question the minor in chambers, or at some other comfortable place other than the courtroom, on the record for a reasonable period of time with the support person, the prosecutor, and defense counsel
 present. The defendant or defendants shall not be present. The court shall conduct the questioning of the minor and shall not permit the prosecutor or defense counsel to examine the minor. The prosecutor and defense counsel shall be permitted to submit proposed questions to the court prior to the session in chambers. Defense counsel shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to consult with the defendant or defendants prior to the conclusion of the session in chambers.

(d) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside of the courtroom, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Make a brief statement on the record, outside of the presence of the jury, of the reasons in support of its order. While the statement need not include traditional
 findings of fact, the reasons shall be set forth with sufficient specificity to permit meaningful review and to demonstrate that discretion was exercised in a careful, reasonable, and equitable manner.

(2) Instruct the members of the jury that they are to draw no inferences from the use of closed-circuit television as a means of facilitating the testimony of the minor.

(3) Instruct respective counsel, outside of the presence of the jury, that they are to make no comment during the course of the trial on the use of closed-circuit television procedures.

(4) Instruct the support witness, outside of the presence of the jury, that he or she is not to coach, cue, or in any way influence or attempt to influence the testimony of
 the minor.

(5) Order that a complete record of the examination of the minor, including the images and voices of all persons who in any way participate in the examination, be made and preserved as a video recording in addition to being stenographically recorded. The video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending and shall be made available for viewing to the prosecuting attorney, the defendant or defendants, and his or her attorney during ordinary business hours. The video recording shall be destroyed after five years have elapsed from the date of entry of judgment. If an appeal is filed, the video recording shall not be destroyed until a final judgment on appeal has been ordered. A video recording that is taken pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose
 of protecting the privacy of the witness. This subdivision does not affect the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 868.7.

(e) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, only the minor, a support person designated pursuant to Section 868.5, a nonuniformed bailiff, any technicians necessary to operate the closed-circuit equipment, and, after consultation with the prosecution and the defense, a representative appointed by the court, shall be physically present for the testimony. A video recording device shall record the image of the minor and his or her testimony, and a separate video recording device shall record the image of the support person.

(f) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another
 place outside the courtroom, the minor shall be brought into the judge’s chambers prior to the taking of his or her testimony to meet for a reasonable period of time with the judge, the prosecutor, and defense counsel. A support person for the minor shall also be present. This meeting shall be for the purpose of explaining the court process to the minor and to allow the attorneys an opportunity to establish rapport with the minor to facilitate later questioning by closed-circuit television. A participant shall not discuss the defendant or defendants or any of the facts of the case with the minor during this meeting.

(g) When the court orders the testimony of a minor to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, this section does not prohibit the court from ordering the minor to be brought into the courtroom for a limited purpose,
 including the identification of the defendant or defendants as the court deems necessary.

(h) The examination shall be under oath, and the defendant or defendants shall be able to see and hear the minor witness, and if two-way closed-circuit television is used, the defendant’s image shall be transmitted live to the witness.

(i) This section does not affect the disqualification of witnesses pursuant to Section 701 of the Evidence Code.

(j) The cost of examination by contemporaneous closed-circuit television ordered pursuant to this section shall be borne by the court out of its existing budget.

(k) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a defendant from
 being represented by counsel during any closed-circuit testimony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 269, Sec. 9.   (SB 811)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to provide the court with discretion to modify court procedures, as a reasonable accommodation, to ensure that adults and children with disabilities who have been victims of an alleged sexual or otherwise specified offense are able to participate effectively in criminal proceedings. In exercising its discretion, the court shall balance the rights of the defendant against the right of the victim who has a disability to full access and participation in the proceedings, while preserving the integrity of the court’s truthfinding function.

(1) For purposes of this section, the term “disability” is defined in paragraphs
 (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(2) The right of the victim is not to confront the perpetrator, but derives under both Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794) and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) as a right to participate in or benefit from the same services or services that are equal or as effective as those enjoyed by persons without disabilities.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in any criminal proceeding in which the defendant is charged with a violation of Section 220, 243.4, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 273a, 273d, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, or former Section 288a,
 subdivision (1) of Section 314, Section 368, 647.6, or with any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subdivision, committed
 with or upon a person with a disability, the court in its discretion may make accommodations to support the person with a disability, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Allow the person with a disability reasonable periods of relief from examination and cross-examination during which he or she may retire from the courtroom. The judge may also allow other witnesses in the proceeding to be examined when the person with a disability retires from the courtroom.

(2) Allow the person with a disability to utilize a support person pursuant to Section 868.5 or a regional center representative providing services to a developmentally disabled individual pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 4620) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 4640) of
 Chapter 5 of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In addition to, or instead of,
 allowing the person with a disability to utilize a support person or regional center representative pursuant to this paragraph, the court may allow the person with a disability to utilize a person necessary to facilitate the communication or physical needs of the person with a disability.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 68110 of the Government Code, the judge may remove his or her robe if the judge believes that this formal attire prevents full participation of the person with a disability because it is intimidating to him or her.

(4) The judge, parties, witnesses, support persons, and court personnel may be relocated within the courtroom to facilitate a more comfortable and personal environment for the person with a disability as well as accommodating any specific
 requirements
 for communication by that person.

(c) The prosecutor may apply for an order that the testimony of the person with a disability at the preliminary hearing, in addition to being stenographically recorded, be video recorded and the video recording preserved.

(1) The application for the order shall be in writing and made three days prior to the preliminary hearing.

(2) Upon timely receipt of the application, the judge shall order that the testimony of the person with a disability given at the preliminary hearing be taken and preserved as a video recording, in addition to being stenographically recorded. The video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending.

(3) If at the time of trial the court finds that further testimony would cause the person with a disability emotional trauma so that he or she is medically unavailable or otherwise unavailable within the meaning of Section 240 of the Evidence Code, the court may admit the video recording of his or her testimony at the preliminary hearing as former testimony under Section 1291 of the Evidence Code.

(4) A video recording that is taken pursuant to this subdivision is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the person with a disability. This subdivision does not affect the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 868.7.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the court in any
 criminal proceeding, upon written notice of the prosecutor made at least three days prior to the date of the preliminary hearing or trial date on which the testimony of the person with a disability is scheduled, or during the course of the proceeding on the court’s own motion, may order that the testimony of the person with a disability be taken by contemporaneous examination and cross-examination in another place and out of the presence of the judge, jury, and defendant, and communicated to the courtroom by means of two-way closed-circuit television, if the court makes all of the following findings:

(1) The person with a disability will be called on to testify concerning facts of an alleged sexual offense, or other crime as specified in subdivision (b), committed on or with that person.

(2) The impact on the person with a disability of one or more of the factors enumerated in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, is shown by clear and convincing evidence to be so substantial as to make the person with a disability unavailable as a witness unless closed-circuit television is used. The refusal of the person with a disability to testify shall not alone constitute sufficient evidence that the special procedure described in this subdivision is necessary in order to accommodate the disability. The court may take into consideration the relationship between the person with a disability and the defendant or defendants.

(A) Threats of serious bodily injury to be inflicted on the person with a disability or a family member, of incarceration, institutionalization, or deportation of the person with a disability or a family
 member, or of removal of the person with a disability from his or her residence by withholding needed services when the threats come from a service provider, in order to prevent or dissuade the person with a disability from attending or giving testimony at any trial or court proceeding or to prevent that person from reporting the alleged offense or from assisting in criminal prosecution.

(B) Use of a firearm or any other deadly weapon during the commission of the crime.

(C) Infliction of great bodily injury upon the person with a disability during the commission of the crime.

(D) Conduct on the part of the defendant or defense counsel during the hearing or trial that causes the person with a disability to be unable
 to continue his or her testimony.

(e) (1) The hearing on the motion brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be conducted out of the presence of the jury.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 804 of the Evidence Code or any other law, the court, in determining the merits of the motion, shall not compel the person with a disability to testify at the hearing, nor shall the court deny the motion on the ground that the person with a disability has not testified.

(3) In determining whether the impact on an individual person with a disability of one or more of the factors enumerated under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) is so substantial that the person is unavailable as a witness unless the closed-circuit television procedure
 is employed, the court may question the person with a disability in chambers, or at some other comfortable place other than the courtroom, on the record for a reasonable period of time with the support person described under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the prosecutor, and defense counsel present. At this time the court shall explain the process to the person with a disability. The defendant or defendants shall not be present; however, the defendant or defendants shall have the opportunity to contemporaneously observe the proceedings by closed-circuit television. Defense counsel shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to consult with the defendant or defendants prior to the conclusion of the session in chambers.

(f) When the court orders the testimony of a victim who is a person with a disability to be taken in another place outside
 of the courtroom, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) Make a brief statement on the record, outside of the presence of the jury, of the reasons in support of its order. While the statement need not include traditional findings of fact, the reasons shall be set forth with sufficient specificity to permit meaningful review and to demonstrate that discretion was exercised in a careful, reasonable, and equitable manner.

(2) Instruct the members of the jury that they are to draw no inferences from the use of closed-circuit television as a means of ensuring the full participation of the victim who is a person with a disability by accommodating that individual’s disability.

(3) Instruct respective counsel, outside of
 the presence of the jury, that they are to make no comment during the course of the trial on the use of closed-circuit television procedures.

(4) Instruct the support person, if the person is part of the court’s accommodation of the disability, outside of the presence of the jury, that he or she is not to coach, cue, or in any way influence or attempt to influence the testimony of the person with a disability.

(5) Order that a complete record of the examination of the person with a disability, including the images and voices of all persons who in any way participate in the examination, be made and preserved as a video recording in addition to being stenographically recorded. The video recording shall be transmitted to the clerk of the court in which the action is pending and shall be made
 available for viewing to the prosecuting attorney, the defendant, and his or her attorney, during ordinary business hours. The video recording shall be destroyed after five years have elapsed from the date of entry of judgment. If an appeal is filed, the video recording shall not be destroyed until a final judgment on appeal has been ordered. A video recording that is taken pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the person with a disability. This subdivision does not affect the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 868.7.

(g) When the court orders the testimony of a victim who is a person with a disability to be taken in another place outside the courtroom, nothing in this section shall prohibit the court from ordering the victim to appear in the courtroom for a
 limited purpose, including the identification of the defendant or defendants as the court deems necessary.

(h) The examination shall be under oath, and the defendant shall be able to see and hear the person with a disability. If two-way closed-circuit television is used, the defendant’s image shall be transmitted live to the person with a disability.

(i) Nothing in this section shall affect the disqualification of witnesses pursuant to Section 701 of the Evidence Code.

(j) The cost of examination by contemporaneous closed-circuit television ordered pursuant to this section shall be borne by the court out of its existing budget.

(k) This section shall not
 be construed to obviate the need to provide other accommodations necessary to ensure accessibility of courtrooms to persons with disabilities nor prescribe a lesser
 standard of accessibility or usability for persons with disabilities than that provided by Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) and federal regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

(l) The Judicial Council shall report to the Legislature, no later than two years after the enactment of this subdivision, on the frequency of the use and effectiveness of admitting the videotape of testimony by means of closed-circuit television.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 98.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Examination of Witnesses on Commission [1349. - 1362.]

1349.

When an issue of fact is joined upon an indictment or information, the defendant may have any material witness, residing out of the state, examined in his behalf, as prescribed in this chapter, and not otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

1350.

When a material witness for the defendant resides out of the State, the defendant may apply for an order that the witness be examined on a commission.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1351.

A commission is a process issued under the seal of the Court and the signature of the Clerk, directed to some person designated as Commissioner, authorizing him to examine the witness upon oath on interrogatories annexed thereto, to take and certify the deposition of the witness, and to return it according to the directions given with the commission.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.

The application must be made upon affidavit, stating:

1. The nature of the offense charged;

2. The state of the proceedings in the action, and that an issue of fact has been joined therein;

3. The name of the witness, and that his testimony is material to the defense of the action;

4. That the witness resides out of the State.

(History: Enacted 1872.)